Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3330.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
Section 1. Legislative findings.
The general assembly finds and declares that:
(1) The General Assembly recognizes the importance of maintaining access to healthcare
services for Rhode Islanders and supporting a stable, functioning healthcare delivery system;
(2) Recent and anticipated federal policy changes are expected to reduce Medicaid
enrollment, resulting in a loss of coverage for thousands of Rhode Islanders;
(3) The loss of insurance coverage does not eliminate the need for healthcare services, but
shifts the cost of delivery of care to providers serving all patients regardless of ability to pay;
(4) Hospitals, community health centers, and other providers will continue to deliver
necessary care, resulting in increased uncompensated care and financial pressure on the healthcare
system;
(5) Reductions in Medicaid enrollment are expected to generate savings within the
Medicaid program;
(6) Aligning those savings with the continued demand for care supports provider stability
and access to services across the state; and
(7) Accordingly, any Medicaid program savings associated with enrollment reductions
shall be retained within the healthcare system and reinvested in providers through targeted increases
in reimbursement.

SECTION 2. Title 42 of the General Laws entitled "STATE AFFAIRS AND
GOVERNMENT" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 169
MEDICAID PROGRAM FUNDING AND REALLOCATION OF ENROLLMENT SAVINGS
42-169-1. Definitions.
As used in this chapter, “enrollment-driven savings” means the reduction in Medicaid
expenditures in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2028, attributable to decreases in enrollment, as
reflected in the estimates adopted at the May meeting of the Rhode Island caseload estimating
conference.
42-169-2. Reallocation of savings.
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary:
(1) All enrollment-driven savings shall be retained within the Medicaid program and shall
not be used for deficit reduction or other purposes;
(2) Such savings shall be reallocated exclusively to increase Medicaid provider
reimbursement rates, including:
(i) Hospital inpatient services;
(ii) Hospital outpatient services;
(iii) Physician services; and
(iv) Federally qualified health center services; and
(3) Funds provided pursuant to this section shall be additive to existing Medicaid
reimbursement levels and shall not be used to supplant, replace, or offset existing appropriations,
rate structures, or payment methodologies in effect as of June 30, 2026.
42-169-3. Implementation.
The executive office of health and human services shall:
(1) Adjust Medicaid fee-for-service reimbursement rates as necessary;
(2) Amend managed care contracts and/or implement state directed payments to ensure that
rate increases are reflected in payments to providers, with a minimum provider pass-through rate
of not less than ninety percent (90%) of each rate increase, implemented within one hundred eighty
(180) days of the effective date of each rate adjustment; and
(3) Submit any required state plan amendments, waivers, or federal approvals to the
Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services.
42-169-4. Reporting and compliance.
The executive office of health and human services shall submit an annual report to the
general assembly no later than October 31 of each year, covering the following:
LC006537 - Page 2 of 4

(1) The calculation of enrollment-driven savings, including the methodology and actuarial
assumptions used;
(2) Provider rate adjustments implemented pursuant to this chapter, itemized by provider
type and care setting;
(3) The total amount of federal financial participation generated by rate investments made
under this chapter;
(4) The status of any required state plan amendments, waivers, or federal approvals,
including any approvals pending or denied by the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services; and
(5) Compliance by managed care organizations with the provider pass-through payment
requirements established under § 42-169-3(2).
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
========
LC006537
========
LC006537 - Page 3 of 4